Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-1105
State Department of Education; education for learners with high ability; consultant; employ.

The State Department of Education has authority to employ a full-time consultant trained and experienced in the field of education for learners with high ability. Such consultant shall encourage, advise, and consult with each school of the state in the development and implementation of plans for education of learners with high ability and shall monitor the implementation of sections 79-1106 to 79-1108.03. For purposes of this section, learner with high ability has the definition found in section 79-1107.

Laws 1967, c. 512, § 1, p. 1718;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-339;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 787;

Laws 1997, LB 347, § 33;

Laws 1998, LB 1229, § 5.